Indiana, session 2026, SB184.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-2.5-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.146-2020,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The state gross retail tax is measured by the
gross retail income received by a retail merchant in a retail unitary or
bundled transaction and, except as provided in subsection (c), is
imposed at seven percent (7%) of that gross retail income.
(b) For purposes of subsection (c), "utility service" means the
provision of any of the following to a person for domestic
consumption:
(1) Electrical energy.
(2) Natural or artificial gas.
(3) Water.
(4) Steam.
(5) Steam heating service.
The term includes utility service provided by a power subsidiary
or a public utility.
(c) The state gross retail tax rate on the sale of utility service to
2026 IN 184—LS 6448/DI 129


a person for domestic consumption is equal to the following:
(1) For a transaction occurring before July 1, 2027, the tax
rate is imposed at seven percent (7%) of the gross retail
income.
(2) For a transaction occurring after June 30, 2027, and
before July 1, 2028, the tax rate is imposed at five and
twenty-five hundredths percent (5.25%) of the gross retail
income.
(3) For a transaction occurring after June 30, 2028, and
before July 1, 2029, the tax rate is imposed at three and
five-tenths percent (3.5%) of the gross retail income.
(4) For a transaction occurring after June 30, 2029, and
before July 1, 2030, the tax rate is imposed at one and
seventy-five hundredths percent (1.75%) of the gross retail
income.
(5) For a transaction occurring after June 30, 2030, no state
gross retail tax is imposed on the transaction.
(b) (d) If the tax computed under subsection (a) or (c) carried to the
third decimal place results in the numeral in the third decimal place
being greater than four (4), the amount of the tax shall be rounded to
the next additional cent.
(c) (e) A seller may elect to round the tax under subsection (b) (d)
on a transaction on an item basis or an invoice basis. However, a seller
may not round the tax under subsection (b) (d) to circumvent the tax
that would otherwise be imposed on a transaction using an invoice
basis.
SECTION 2. IC 6-2.5-2-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The legislative services agency shall prepare
legislation for introduction during the 2030 regular session of the
general assembly to make any necessary changes to the Indiana
Code to conform to the amendments made to section 2 of this
chapter in the 2026 session of the general assembly.
(b) This section expires December 31, 2030.
2026 IN 184—LS 6448/DI 129